Nevada, session 83, SB105.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 687B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. An insurer that offers any Medicare supplemental policy
for delivery in this State shall allow a person who is eligible to
purchase a Medicare supplemental policy classified as guaranteed
issue under 42 U.S.C. § 1395ss or any other applicable federal or
state law or regulations to purchase any standardized benefit plan
offered by the insurer which is available for issuance to new
insureds. For purposes of this subsection only, a policy that is
issued solely pursuant to NRS 687B.352 is not classified as
guaranteed issue.
2. The provisions of subsection 1 must not be construed to
require an insurer to sell or issue any policy where prohibited by
federal law.
3. An insurer or other person or entity shall not vary the
commission associated with the purchase of a Medicare
supplemental policy, pay differential commissions associated with
the purchase of a Medicare supplemental policy or otherwise treat
a Medicare supplemental policy differently for the purposes of
commission because the policy is classified as guaranteed issue
under 42 U.S.C. § 1395ss or any other applicable federal or state
law or regulations.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Medicare supplemental policy” has the meaning ascribed
to it in 42 C.F.R. § 403.205.
(b) “Standardized benefit plan”:
(1) Means a Medicare supplemental policy with a
particular package of benefits as required by federal law; and
(2) Includes, without limitation, any Medicare
supplemental policy designated as Standardized Benefit Plan A to
N, inclusive, any high deductible version of any such plan and any
other standardized package of benefits for Medicare supplemental
policies that may be established by federal law.
Sec. 2. NRS 695B.320 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695B.320 1. Nonprofit hospital and medical or dental service
corporations are subject to the provisions of this chapter, and to the
provisions of chapters 679A and 679B of NRS, subsections 2, 4, 17,
-
*SB105*

– 3 –
18 and 30 of NRS 680B.010, NRS 680B.025 to 680B.060,
inclusive, chapter 681B of NRS, NRS 686A.010 to 686A.315,
inclusive, 686B.010 to 686B.175, inclusive, 687B.010 to
687B.040, inclusive, 687B.070 to 687B.140, inclusive, 687B.150,
687B.160, 687B.180, 687B.200 to 687B.255, inclusive, 687B.270,
687B.310 to 687B.380, inclusive, and section 1 of this act,
687B.410, 687B.420, 687B.430, 687B.500 and chapters 692B,
692C, 693A and 696B of NRS, to the extent applicable and not in
conflict with the express provisions of this chapter.
2. For the purposes of this section and the provisions set forth
in subsection 1, a nonprofit hospital and medical or dental service
corporation is included in the meaning of the term “insurer.”
Sec. 3. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 and 2 of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*SB105*